Washington statutes.
RCW 26.12.040

Substitute judge of family court.

In counties having more than one judge of the superior court the presiding judge may appoint a judge other than the judge of the family court to act as judge of the family court during any period when the judge of the family court is on vacation, absent, or for any reason unable to perform his or her duties. Any judge so appointed shall have all the powers and authority of a judge of the family court in cases under this chapter.

[ 2011 c 336 s 692; 1949 c 50 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 997-33.]